Idaho, session 2025, S1107.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to Public Safety the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(1) DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION:
I. MANAGEMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $12,592,100 $13,523,800 $26,115,900
Inmate Labor
Fund 383,700 10,000 393,700
Parolee Supervision
Fund 339,100 132,300 471,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 1,327,000 167,400 1,494,400
TOTAL $14,641,900 $13,833,500 $28,475,400
II. STATE PRISONS:
A. PRISONS ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,602,800 $929,900 $6,532,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 289,500 161,400 450,900
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund $160,000 160,000
Federal Grant
Fund 771,700 770,300 0 1,542,000
TOTAL $6,664,000 $1,861,600 $160,000 $8,685,600
B. IDAHO STATE CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $31,868,300 $4,046,900 $35,915,200
Inmate Labor
Fund 53,000 53,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 884,700 224,000 1,108,700
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 1,189,400 1,189,400
TOTAL $32,753,000 $5,513,300 $38,266,300
C. IDAHO STATE CORRECTIONAL CENTER - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $30,733,400 $6,323,900 $37,057,300
Inmate Labor
Fund 10,500 10,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 462,300 462,300
TOTAL $30,733,400 $6,796,700 $37,530,100
D. IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - OROFINO:
FROM:
General
Fund $11,708,000 $1,866,800 $13,574,800
Inmate Labor
Fund 1,267,300 534,500 1,801,800


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 95,200 67,200 162,400
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 55,800 55,800
TOTAL $13,070,500 $2,524,300 $15,594,800
E. IDAHO MAXIMUM SECURITY INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $15,535,400 $1,883,500 $17,418,900
Inmate Labor
Fund 53,200 53,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 71,100 71,100
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 22,000 22,000
TOTAL $15,535,400 $2,029,800 $17,565,200
F. NORTH IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - COTTONWOOD:
FROM:
General
Fund $7,139,600 $1,160,000 $8,299,600
Inmate Labor
Fund 46,300 46,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 72,200 114,200 186,400
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 14,800 14,800
TOTAL $7,211,800 $1,335,300 $8,547,100
G. SOUTH IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $12,323,900 $2,441,800 $14,765,700
Inmate Labor
Fund 4,306,000 980,400 5,286,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 191,800 109,400 301,200
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 24,500 24,500
TOTAL $16,821,700 $3,556,100 $20,377,800
H. ST. ANTHONY WORK CAMP:
FROM:
General
Fund $6,000,400 $869,500 $6,869,900
Inmate Labor
Fund 1,940,900 898,200 2,839,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 27,000 27,000
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 1,900 1,900
TOTAL $7,941,300 $1,796,600 $9,737,900
I. POCATELLO WOMEN'S CORRECTIONAL CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,233,300 $1,076,900 $9,310,200
Inmate Labor
Fund 618,600 84,400 703,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 333,500 120,400 453,900
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 31,100 31,100
TOTAL $9,185,400 $1,312,800 $10,498,200
J. SOUTH BOISE WOMEN'S CORRECTIONAL CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,561,900 $665,500 $6,227,400
Inmate Labor
Fund 200 200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 42,800 42,800
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 8,800 8,800
TOTAL $5,561,900 $717,300 $6,279,200
K. MOUNTAIN VIEW TRANSFORMATION CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $7,306,800 $1,961,400 $9,268,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 300,000 300,000
TOTAL $7,306,800 $2,261,400 $9,568,200
DIVISIONTOTAL $152,785,200 $29,705,200 $160,000 $182,650,400
III. COUNTY & OUT-OF-STATE PLACEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $31,856,500 $31,856,500
IV. COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS:
A. COMMUNITY SUPERVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $29,982,700 $10,156,600 $1,000,000 $41,139,300
Inmate Labor
Fund 115,600 115,600
Parolee Supervision
Fund 7,316,400 1,812,200 9,128,600
Drug and Mental Health Court Supervision
Fund 381,100 27,200 408,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 439,100 439,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 93,600 595,300 400,000 1,088,900
TOTAL $38,212,900 $12,706,900 $1,400,000 $52,319,800
B. COMMUNITY REENTRY CENTERS:
FROM:
General
Fund $6,727,700 $47,700 $6,775,400
State-Directed Opioid Settlement
Fund 167,400 423,600 591,000
Inmate Labor
Fund 3,897,900 2,842,500 6,740,400
TOTAL $10,793,000 $3,313,800 $14,106,800
DIVISIONTOTAL $49,005,900 $16,020,700 $1,400,000 $66,426,600
V. COMMUNITY-BASED SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,915,000 $46,100 $1,846,500 $3,807,600
VI. MEDICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $63,629,000 $63,629,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 135,000 135,000
TOTAL $63,764,000 $63,764,000
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $218,348,000 $155,226,000 $160,000 $3,246,500 $376,980,500
(2) DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE CORRECTIONS:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,705,700 $854,400 $60,000 $4,620,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 16,400 0 16,400
TOTAL $3,705,700 $870,800 $60,000 $4,636,500
B. COMMUNITY, OPERATIONS, AND PROGRAM SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,894,700 $326,100 $7,651,000 $9,871,800
Juvenile Corrections
Fund 110,000 110,000
Juvenile Corrections - Cigarette/Tobacco Tax
Fund 4,375,000 4,375,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 327,000 327,000
Federal Grant
Fund 0 199,600 521,000 720,600
TOTAL $1,894,700 $635,700 $12,874,000 $15,404,400
C. INSTITUTIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $31,810,700 $2,610,100 $2,553,500 $36,974,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 238,600 460,000 698,600
State Juvenile Corrections Center Endowment Income
Fund 1,073,800 1,073,800
Federal Grant
Fund 231,800 768,400 475,400 1,475,600
TOTAL $32,042,500 $4,690,900 $3,488,900 $40,222,300
DIVISIONTOTAL $37,642,900 $6,197,400 $16,422,900 $60,263,200
(3) IDAHO STATE POLICE:
I. BRAND INSPECTION:
FROM:


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
State Brand Board
Fund $3,535,000 $510,600 $4,045,600
II. DIVISION OF IDAHO STATE POLICE:
A. DIRECTOR'S OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,520,400 $212,100 $2,732,500
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 160,700 2,500 163,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 79,600 79,600
Federal Grant
Fund 83,900 18,100 102,000
TOTAL $2,765,000 $312,300 $3,077,300
B. CAPITOL PROTECTIVE SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,082,600 $116,000 $2,198,600
Idaho Law Enforcement
Fund 213,500 213,500
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 269,000 6,400 275,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 131,100 7,200 138,300
TOTAL $2,482,700 $343,100 $2,825,800
C. INVESTIGATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $9,367,000 $949,300 $10,316,300
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 1,240,200 29,100 1,269,300
Drug & DWUI Enforcement Donation
Fund 211,700 497,600 709,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 346,700 658,300 $210,000 1,215,000
TOTAL $11,165,600 $2,134,300 $210,000 $13,509,900
D. PATROL:
FROM:
General
Fund $28,380,900 $4,378,300 $503,900 $33,263,100
Idaho Law Enforcement
Fund 4,943,200 788,100 5,731,300
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 3,934,100 115,000 4,049,100
Hazardous Materials/Waste Enforcement
Fund 609,700 78,800 $67,800 756,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 630,100 79,000 709,100
Federal Grant
Fund 4,062,800 1,115,400 0 4,132,200 9,310,400
TOTAL $42,560,800 $6,554,600 $503,900 $4,200,000 $53,819,300
E. LAW ENFORCEMENT PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $157,800 $180,700 $338,500
Alcohol Beverage Control
Fund 1,879,900 520,500 2,400,400
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 295,200 5,600 300,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 12,500 12,500
Federal Grant
Fund 94,900 10,000 104,900
TOTAL $2,427,800 $729,300 $3,157,100
F. SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
General
Fund $2,879,700 $1,260,300 $4,140,000
Alcohol Beverage Control
Fund 91,200 5,900 97,100
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 28,600 2,400 31,000
Idaho Law Enforcement Telecommunications
Fund 908,800 1,327,600 2,236,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 2,174,200 1,906,500 4,080,700
Federal Grant
Fund 47,000 35,800 82,800
TOTAL $6,129,500 $4,538,500 $10,668,000
G. FORENSIC SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,783,900 $1,082,800 $6,866,700
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 505,500 22,900 528,400
Drug & DWUI Enforcement Donation
Fund 500,200 500,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 199,100 131,500 330,600
Federal Grant
Fund 913,400 2,370,600 3,284,000
TOTAL $7,401,900 $4,108,000 $11,509,900
DIVISIONTOTAL $74,933,300 $18,720,100 $503,900 $4,410,000 $98,567,300
III. POST ACADEMY:
A. PEACE OFFICER STANDARDS AND TRAINING ACADEMY:
FROM:
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund $34,500 $14,800 $49,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Peace Officers Training
Fund 3,116,700 2,175,700 $155,900 5,448,300
Misdemeanor Probation Training
Fund 21,100 30,400 30,000 81,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 29,000 29,000
Federal Grant
Fund 37,500 221,200 0 258,700
TOTAL $3,209,800 $2,471,100 $185,900 $5,866,800
IV. RACING COMMISSION:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $298,800 $171,000 $469,800
Pari-Mutuel Distribution
Fund 0 0 $30,000 30,000
TOTAL $298,800 $171,000 $30,000 $499,800
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $81,976,900 $21,872,800 $503,900 $4,625,900 $108,979,500
GRANDTOTAL $337,967,800 $183,296,200 $663,900 $24,295,300 $546,223,200
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the departments in Public Safety is authorized no more
than the following number of full-time equivalent positions at any point
during the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, unless specifically
authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee
will be notified promptly of any increased positions so authorized.
Department of Correction ...................................2,254.85
Department of Juvenile Corrections ...........................409.00
Idaho State Police ...........................................658.76
SECTION 3. EXEMPTIONS FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The De-
partment of Correction is hereby exempted from the provisions of Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers between programs for
all moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026; provided, however, moneys appropriated to the County and Out-of-State
Placement Program and the Medical Services Program may only be transferred


between said programs. Legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 4. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may
be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies that are
authorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.
SECTION 5. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.